sn_ZW/sn_ZW.aff
PFX A 0 twuchafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchago/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchahu/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchahwu/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchai/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchaka/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchaku/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchambo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchamu/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchandi/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchando/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchango/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchano/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchapa/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchari/D . 
PFX A 0 twucharu/D . 
PFX A 0 twucharwu/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchasi/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchati/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchato/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchatu/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchatwu/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchau/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchava/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchawa/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchazai/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchazo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchazvi/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchi/G . 
PFX A 0 twuchido/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchifano/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchifumo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchigaro/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchigo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchiisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchimbo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchindo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchingo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchinguno/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchino/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchinyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchinyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchisi/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchisvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchisviko/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchiswero/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchito/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchiwanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchizai/D . 
PFX A 0 twuchizo/D . 
PFX A 0 twuka/G . 
PFX A 0 twukado/D . 
PFX A 0 twukafano/D . 
PFX A 0 twukafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 twukagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 twukago/D . 
PFX A 0 twukaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 twukambo/D . 
PFX A 0 twukando/D . 
PFX A 0 twukango/D . 
PFX A 0 twukanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 twukano/D . 
PFX A 0 twukanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 twukanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 twukasi/D . 
PFX A 0 twukasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 twukasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 twukaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 twukato/D . 
PFX A 0 twukawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 twukazai/D . 
PFX A 0 twukazo/D . 
PFX A 0 twunga/D . 
PFX A 0 twunga/G . 
PFX A 0 twungaa/D . 
PFX A 0 twungachi/D . 
PFX A 0 twungado/D . 
PFX A 0 twungadzi/D . 
PFX A 0 twungafano/D . 
PFX A 0 twungafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 twungagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 twungago/D . 
PFX A 0 twungahu/D . 
PFX A 0 twungahwu/D . 
PFX A 0 twungai/D . 
PFX A 0 twungaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 twungaka/D . 
PFX A 0 twungaku/D . 
PFX A 0 twungambo/D . 
PFX A 0 twungamu/D . 
PFX A 0 twungandi/D . 
PFX A 0 twungando/D . 
PFX A 0 twungango/D . 
PFX A 0 twunganguno/D . 
PFX A 0 twungano/D . 
PFX A 0 twunganyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 twunganyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 twungapa/D . 
PFX A 0 twungari/D . 
PFX A 0 twungaru/D . 
PFX A 0 twungarwu/D . 
PFX A 0 twungasi/D . 
PFX A 0 twungasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 twungasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 twungaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 twungati/D . 
PFX A 0 twungato/D . 
PFX A 0 twungatu/D . 
PFX A 0 twungatwu/D . 
PFX A 0 twungau/D . 
PFX A 0 twungava/D . 
PFX A 0 twungawa/D . 
PFX A 0 twungawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 twungazai/D . 
PFX A 0 twungazo/D . 
PFX A 0 twungazvi/D . 
PFX A 0 twuno/D . 
PFX A 0 twuno/F . 
PFX A 0 twuno/G . 
PFX A 0 twunoa/D . 
PFX A 0 twunochi/D . 
PFX A 0 twunodo/D . 
PFX A 0 twunodzi/D . 
PFX A 0 twunofano/D . 
PFX A 0 twunofumo/D . 
PFX A 0 twunogaro/D . 
PFX A 0 twunogo/D . 
PFX A 0 twunohu/D . 
PFX A 0 twunohwu/D . 
PFX A 0 twunoi/D . 
PFX A 0 twunoisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 twunoka/D . 
PFX A 0 twunoku/D . 
PFX A 0 twunombo/D . 
PFX A 0 twunomu/D . 
PFX A 0 twunondi/D . 
PFX A 0 twunondo/D . 
PFX A 0 twunongo/D . 
PFX A 0 twunonguno/D . 
PFX A 0 twunono/D . 
PFX A 0 twunonyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 twunonyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 twunopa/D . 
PFX A 0 twunori/D . 
PFX A 0 twunoru/D . 
PFX A 0 twunorwu/D . 
PFX A 0 twunosi/D . 
PFX A 0 twunosvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 twunosviko/D . 
PFX A 0 twunoswero/D . 
PFX A 0 twunoti/D . 
PFX A 0 twunoto/D . 
PFX A 0 twunotu/D . 
PFX A 0 twunotwu/D . 
PFX A 0 twunou/D . 
PFX A 0 twunova/D . 
PFX A 0 twunowa/D . 
PFX A 0 twunowanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 twunozai/D . 
PFX A 0 twunozo/D . 
PFX A 0 twunozvi/D . 
PFX A 0 twusa/D . 
PFX A 0 twusado/D . 
PFX A 0 twusafano/D . 
PFX A 0 twusafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 twusago/D . 
PFX A 0 twusaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusambo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusando/D . 
PFX A 0 twusango/D . 
PFX A 0 twusanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 twusano/D . 
PFX A 0 twusanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 twusasi/D . 
PFX A 0 twusasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 twusasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 twusaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 twusato/D . 
PFX A 0 twusawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusazai/D . 
PFX A 0 twusazo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusinga/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingado/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingafano/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingago/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingambo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingando/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingango/D . 
PFX A 0 twusinganguno/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingano/D . 
PFX A 0 twusinganyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusinganyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingasi/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingato/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingazai/D . 
PFX A 0 twusingazo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisa/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisado/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisafano/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisago/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisambo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisando/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisango/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisano/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisasi/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisato/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisazai/D . 
PFX A 0 twusisazo/D . 
PFX A 0 u/CDF . 
PFX A 0 ucha/D . 
PFX A 0 ucha/F . 
PFX A 0 ucha/G . 
PFX A 0 uchaa/D . 
PFX A 0 uchachi/D . 
PFX A 0 uchado/D . 
PFX A 0 uchadzi/D . 
PFX A 0 uchafano/D . 
PFX A 0 uchafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 uchago/D . 
PFX A 0 uchahu/D . 
PFX A 0 uchahwu/D . 
PFX A 0 uchai/D . 
PFX A 0 uchaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchaka/D . 
PFX A 0 uchaku/D . 
PFX A 0 uchambo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchamu/D . 
PFX A 0 uchandi/D . 
PFX A 0 uchando/D . 
PFX A 0 uchango/D . 
PFX A 0 uchanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 uchano/D . 
PFX A 0 uchanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 uchapa/D . 
PFX A 0 uchari/D . 
PFX A 0 ucharu/D . 
PFX A 0 ucharwu/D . 
PFX A 0 uchasi/D . 
PFX A 0 uchasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 uchasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 uchaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 uchati/D . 
PFX A 0 uchato/D . 
PFX A 0 uchatu/D . 
PFX A 0 uchatwu/D . 
PFX A 0 uchau/D . 
PFX A 0 uchava/D . 
PFX A 0 uchawa/D . 
PFX A 0 uchawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchazai/D . 
PFX A 0 uchazo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchazvi/D . 
PFX A 0 uchi/G . 
PFX A 0 uchido/D . 
PFX A 0 uchifano/D . 
PFX A 0 uchifumo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchigaro/D . 
PFX A 0 uchigo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchiisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchimbo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchindo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchingo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchinguno/D . 
PFX A 0 uchino/D . 
PFX A 0 uchinyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchinyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 uchisi/D . 
PFX A 0 uchisvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 uchisviko/D . 
PFX A 0 uchiswero/D . 
PFX A 0 uchito/D . 
PFX A 0 uchiwanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 uchizai/D . 
PFX A 0 uchizo/D . 
PFX A 0 uka/G . 
PFX A 0 ukado/D . 
PFX A 0 ukafano/D . 
PFX A 0 ukafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 ukagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 ukago/D . 
PFX A 0 ukaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 ukambo/D . 
PFX A 0 ukando/D . 
PFX A 0 ukango/D . 
PFX A 0 ukanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 ukano/D . 
PFX A 0 ukanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 ukanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 ukasi/D . 
PFX A 0 ukasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 ukasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 ukaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 ukato/D . 
PFX A 0 ukawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 ukazai/D . 
PFX A 0 ukazo/D . 
PFX A 0 unga/D . 
PFX A 0 unga/G . 
PFX A 0 ungaa/D . 
PFX A 0 ungachi/D . 
PFX A 0 ungado/D . 
PFX A 0 ungadzi/D . 
PFX A 0 ungafano/D . 
PFX A 0 ungafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 ungagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 ungago/D . 
PFX A 0 ungahu/D . 
PFX A 0 ungahwu/D . 
PFX A 0 ungai/D . 
PFX A 0 ungaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 ungaka/D . 
PFX A 0 ungaku/D . 
PFX A 0 ungambo/D . 
PFX A 0 ungamu/D . 
PFX A 0 ungandi/D . 
PFX A 0 ungando/D . 
PFX A 0 ungango/D . 
PFX A 0 unganguno/D . 
PFX A 0 ungano/D . 
PFX A 0 unganyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 unganyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 ungapa/D . 
PFX A 0 ungari/D . 
PFX A 0 ungaru/D . 
PFX A 0 ungarwu/D . 
PFX A 0 ungasi/D . 
PFX A 0 ungasvikiro/D . 
