sn_ZW/sn_ZW.dic
ashira/AVQ
banganuka/AVQ
batikana/AVQ
bendesa/AVQ
bhabhamiswa/AVQ
bhara/AVQ
bhera/AVQ
bhogodza/AVQ
bhugumudza/AVQ
bidaira/AVQ
binza/AVQ
bizha/AVQ
bondera/AVQ
bovedza/AVQ
budza/AVQ
bunha/AVQ
buurura/AVQ
bvara/AVQ
bvikinyidza/AVQ
bvongonyodza/AVQ
bvubvura/AVQ
bvumbuka/AVQ
bvunyara/AVQ
bvuva/AVQ
bwazhama/AVQ
bwibwimara/AVQ
bwodoka/AVQ
chachata/AVQ
chakwaidza/AVQ
chapura/AVQ
checheredza/AVQ
cheketera/AVQ
chengetedza/AVQ
chepfuka/AVQ
chibikira/AVQ
chingidzira/AVQ
chivhura/AVQ
choona/AVQ
chwabaira/AVQ
daima/AVQ
danhuka/AVQ
dazura/AVQ
dembera/AVQ
deno/AVQ
dhabwadhidza/AVQ
dhasha/AVQ
dhifenda/AVQ
dhivana/AVQ
dhonzerana/AVQ
dhuruma/AVQ
dimba/AVQ
diya/AVQ
dongera/AVQ
dozva/AVQ
dumhaidza/AVQ
dusva/AVQ
dyiwa/AVQ
dzama/AVQ
dzedzeresa/AVQ
dziirira/AVQ
dzimbirwa/AVQ
dzipurira/AVQ
dzohona/AVQ
dzonyongodza/AVQ
dzungudza/AVQ
dzvatsa/AVQ
dzvongama/AVQ
edzerera/AVQ
endirira/AVQ
esa/AVQ
faka/AVQ
fanyangura/AVQ
fashama/AVQ
fefeta/AVQ
femuruka/AVQ
feru/AVQ
fifinyika/AVQ
firira/AVQ
fombonora/AVQ
foonora/AVQ
fozhoka/AVQ
fufunurwa/AVQ
fukatidza/AVQ
fumbata/AVQ
fundumara/AVQ
funhaidza/AVQ
furadha/AVQ
furusa/AVQ
futura/AVQ
gacha/AVQ
gaga/AVQ
gamushira/AVQ
gara/AVQ
gaya/AVQ
gireta/AVQ
gogonera/AVQ
gonana/AVQ
gorogoda/AVQ
gudumudza/AVQ
guma-guma/AVQ
gumhinira/AVQ
gunzva/AVQ
gurwa/AVQ
gwabvura/AVQ
gwamura/AVQ
gwebudza/AVQ
gwenderedza/AVQ
gwisa/AVQ
haya/AVQ
horera/AVQ
hwaira-hwaira/AVQ
hweta/AVQ
imba/AVQ
isa/AVQ
jairira/AVQ
jega/AVQ
jita/AVQ
juja/AVQ
kahadza/AVQ
kakarika/AVQ
kambadza/AVQ
kandura/AVQ
kanhaidza/AVQ
kapira/AVQ
karinga/AVQ
katakadza/AVQ
kavira/AVQ
keta/AVQ
kobvomara/AVQ
kodza/AVQ
kokomwa/AVQ
kombonodza/AVQ
konewa/AVQ
koora/AVQ
koropa/AVQ
kotama/AVQ
kozhomoka/AVQ
kuhumuka/AVQ
kumbana/AVQ
kunda/AVQ
kunun'undza/AVQ
kurumbira/AVQ
kuta/AVQ
kuvara/AVQ
kwachaura/AVQ
kwamura/AVQ
kwapaidza/AVQ
kwatidzira/AVQ
kwedera/AVQ
kwenya/AVQ
kwevera/AVQ
kwinyata/AVQ
makira/AVQ
manikidzira/AVQ
matapuraya/AVQ
mbombova/AVQ
mburumbutsa/AVQ
menda/AVQ
mhanza/AVQ
mhwiza/AVQ
misidzana/AVQ
mononoka/AVQ
mukisa/AVQ
mveya/AVQ
mwapwatira/AVQ
mwekura/AVQ
na/AVQ
namata/AVQ
n'an'azhura/AVQ
n'ashira/AVQ
ndandama/AVQ
ndeya/AVQ
ndova/AVQ
ndyundyuta/AVQ
nengemadza/AVQ
nganduka/AVQ
ngengedza/AVQ
ngorekedza/AVQ
ngungura/AVQ
ngwangwadza/AVQ
ngwingwidza/AVQ
nhinhidza/AVQ
nhuwirira/AVQ
njacha/AVQ
njeesa/AVQ
njeya/AVQ
nonga-nonga/AVQ
nuka/AVQ
nwira/AVQ
nyamarara/AVQ
nyanduri/AVQ
nyanyata/AVQ
nyatsama/AVQ
nyemwerera/AVQ
nyera/AVQ
nyevenutsa/AVQ
nyira/AVQ
nyondora/AVQ
nyukira/AVQ
nyunyutsa/AVQ
nzunzutisa/AVQ
nzvinginzvira/AVQ
odomoka/AVQ
onana/AVQ
onyoka/AVQ
pabuka/AVQ
pagadura/AVQ
pakira/AVQ
pamhadzura/AVQ
pandambadza/AVQ
panha/AVQ
paparitsa/AVQ
parara/AVQ
pasura/AVQ
paura/AVQ
pedegara/AVQ
penda/AVQ
pepa/AVQ
pereredzera/AVQ
petenura/AVQ
pfahura/AVQ
pfauna/AVQ
pferenyuka/AVQ
pfimbika/AVQ
pfododza/AVQ
pfozora/AVQ
pfuhwira/AVQ
pfumbisa/AVQ
pfumvura/AVQ
pfunya/AVQ
pfupfuruka/AVQ
pfutunudza/AVQ
pidaira/AVQ
pimbiringa/AVQ
pindurika/AVQ
pinyura/AVQ
piringa/AVQ
pisirira/AVQ
pokonora/AVQ
pona/AVQ
poromota/AVQ
pozhomoka/AVQ
pukunyura/AVQ
punga/AVQ
pupa/AVQ
purura/AVQ
pwanyira/AVQ
rabadutsa/AVQ
rambanyutsa/AVQ
rasa-rasa/AVQ
redza/AVQ
renda/AVQ
ribha/AVQ
ringaringa/AVQ
rombera/AVQ
rovera/AVQ
rumira/AVQ
rwarira/AVQ
sakidza/AVQ
sasa/AVQ
senda/AVQ
seva/AVQ
shandira/AVQ
shaudzira/AVQ
shingaira/AVQ
shomesa/AVQ
shudha/AVQ
shwakatika/AVQ
simudzira/AVQ
soma/AVQ
sukisa/AVQ
sunhuka/AVQ
suwisa/AVQ
svesvenha/AVQ
svipisa/AVQ
svota/AVQ
swebera/AVQ
taka/AVQ
tamura/AVQ
tanhatu/AVQ
tara-tara/AVQ
tatsurana/AVQ
tefenyeka/AVQ
temura/AVQ
tenhuka/AVQ
tetembera/AVQ
tibvinya/AVQ
tinhaira/AVQ
tochaira/AVQ
tonona/AVQ
tsamhinhisa/AVQ
tsaura/AVQ
tsetseka/AVQ
tsindidza/AVQ
tsivama/AVQ
tsukunuka/AVQ
tsutsuta/AVQ
tsvedzemutsa/AVQ
tsvinya/AVQ
tswinzwinya/AVQ
tuma/AVQ
tupfunuka/AVQ
tuturuka/AVQ
tyisidzira/AVQ
unaira/AVQ
urukutika/AVQ
vanda/AVQ
vavarira/AVQ
vhaima/AVQ
vhengera/AVQ
vhitura/AVQ
vhuna/AVQ
vhuya/AVQ
vonisa/AVQ
wanzira/AVQ
winisa/AVQ
wungudza/AVQ
yemudza/AVQ
zamurisa/AVQ
zeveza/AVQ
zhizhira/AVQ
zonda/AVQ
zvambaradza/AVQ
zvininipisa/AVQ
